src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@niuksatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@niuksatus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nivelliir+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n`ivell´iir TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nivend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nivend REDEL ;
nivh+N:n´ivh TAUD ;
nivoo+N:niv´oo ARMEE ;
nišš+N:n´išš TAUD ;
njuufaundlane+N:nj´uu#f´aundlane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@njuuton+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nj´uuton REDEL ;
noahaav+N:n´oa#h´aav%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
noahoop+N:n´oa#h´oop TAUD ;
noatera+N:n´oa#tera%>%{pl.i%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nobedus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nobedus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nobelist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nobel´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nobless+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nobl´ess TAUD ;
nodi+N:nod,i KAVA ;
nogailane+N:nog´ailane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nohik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nohik VIRSIK ;
nohin+N:nohin MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nohistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nohistus OLULINE ;
nohu+N:nohu KAVA ;
nohutõbi+N:nohu#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
nokamees+N:noka#me MEES ;
nokastanu+N:nokastanu AASTA ;
nokastunu+N:nokastunu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nokats REDEL ;
nokatsmüts+N:nokats#m´üt,s TAUD ;
nokaut+N:nok#´aut TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokdaun+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nokd´aun TAUD ;
nokis+N:nokis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nokitsus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´okk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
nokkmüts+N:n´okk#m´üt,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokturn+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nokt´urn TAUD ;
noku+N:noku PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nokutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nokutus OLULINE ;
nolgus+N:nolgus SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nolk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ol,k TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nomaad+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nom´aad TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nomenklatuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nomenklat´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nominaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n`omin´aal TAUD ;
nominaalhind+N:nomin´aal#h´inD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nominaalväärtus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nomin´aal#v´äärtus SUULINE ;
nominalism+N:nominal´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nominatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n`ominat´iiv TAUD ;
nonkonformism+N:non#konform´ism TAUD ;
nonkonformist+N:non#konform´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nonparell+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nonpar´el,l TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nonsenss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ons´enss TAUD ;
noodaline+N:noodaline OLULINE ;
noodamees+N:nooda#me MEES ;
noodavedaja+N:nooda#vedaja AASTA ;
noodistik+N:n`ood,ist´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noodistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nood,istus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noogutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noogutus OLULINE ;
nook+N:n´ook%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nookur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ookur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nool+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ool%{stemill%}%{rare%} KEEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noolutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noolutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noomen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oomen REDEL ;
noomija+N:n´oomija AASTA ;
noomimine+N:n´oomimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noomitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noomitus OLULINE ;
noomituskõne+N:noomitus#kõne PERE ;
@R.Part.One@noon+N:@R.Part.One@n´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noonius+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oonius OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oor%{stemill%} KEEL ;
noorem-olek+N:noorem-olek VIRSIK ;
nooreminspektor+N:noorem#insp´ektor REDEL ;
nooremleitnant+N:noorem#l´eitn´ant TAUD ;
nooremlipnik+N:noorem#l´ipn´ik ÄMBLIK ;
nooremseersant+N:noorem#s´eers´ant TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nooremus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nooremus OLULINE ;
noorendik+N:n`oorend´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noorendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noorendus OLULINE ;
noorhärra+N:n´oor#härra PERE ;
nooriga+N:n´oor#iG1a%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noorik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noorik VIRSIK ;
noorikumees+N:nooriku#me MEES ;
noorkari+N:n´oor#k´arJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
noorkorvpallur+N:n´oor#k´orv#p´allur REDEL ;
noorkotkas+N:n´oor#k´otka KOTKAS ;
noorlammas+N:n´oor#l´amB1a KOTKAS ;
noormees+N:n´oor#me MEES ;
noorpaar+N:n´oor#p´aar TAUD ;
noorpere+N:n´oor#pere%{stemill%} PERE ;
noorpoeet+N:n´oor#po´eet TAUD ;
noorpoliitik+N:n´oor#poliitik VIRSIK ;
noorpõlv+N:n´oor#p´õl, PÕLV ;
noorrahvas+N:n´oor#r´ahva KOTKAS ;
noorsand+N:n´oor#s´and TAUD ;
noorsoo-kuritegevus+N:n´oor#s´oo-kuri#tegevus OLULINE ;
noorsookuritegu+N:n´oor#s´oo#kuri#teG1u KAVA ;
noorsoopolitsei+N:n´oor#s´oo#p`olits´ei ARMEE ;
noorsugu+N:n´oor#suG1u KAVA ;
noorsõdur+N:n´oor#sõdur REDEL ;
noortekas+N:noorteka LOHAKAS ;
noorteklass+N:noorte#kl´as,s TAUD ;
noortekool+N:noorte#k´ool, TAUD ;
noortekoondis+N:noorte#k´oondis KATKINE ;
noortemeeskond+N:noorte#m´eesk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
noorteorganisatsioon+N:noorte#organisatsi´oon TAUD ;
noortesari+N:noorte#s´arJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noorteühendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@noorte#ühendus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nooruk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nooruk REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noorur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oorur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noorus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oorus SUULINE ;
noorusaasta+N:n´oorus#´aasta AASTA ;
noorusaeg+N:n´oorus#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
noorusiga+N:n´oorus#iG1a%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nooruslikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n`oorusl´ikkus SUULINE ;
nooruspäev+N:n´oorus#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
nooruspõlv+N:n´oorus#p´õl, PÕLV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oos, TAUD ;
noot+N:n´oot%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noot+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´oot, TAUD ;
nooteater+N:noo#t´eatE2r REDEL ;
noova+N:noova PERE ;
nopped+N:n´opP1e PINGE ;
noppimine+N:n´oppimine OLULINE ;
@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@nord+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@n´ord TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@norg+N:@R.Part.One@n´orG1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
norija+N:norija AASTA ;
norin+N:norin MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@norm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´orm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@normaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@norm´aal TAUD ;
normaalaeg+N:norm´aal#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@normaalsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@norm´aalsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@normann+N:@P.Stem.Nom@norm´an,n TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@normatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n`ormat´iiv TAUD ;
normatiivakt+N:n`ormat´iiv#´akt TAUD ;
normeerimine+N:norm´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@normikohasus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@normi#kohasus OLULINE ;
normistik+N:n`ormist´ik ELANIK ;
norralane+N:norralane OLULINE ;
norralanna+N:norralanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@norsatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@norsatus OLULINE ;
norse+N:n´orsK1e PINGE ;
norskamine+N:n´orskamine OLULINE ;
norutamine+N:norutamine OLULINE ;
norutuju+N:noru#tuju%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
norutunne+N:noru#t´unD1e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@norutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@norutus OLULINE ;
nosin+N:nosin MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nospel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ospE2l REDEL ;
nostalgia+N:nost´algia AASTA ;
nostalgiahoog+N:nost´algia#h´ooG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
nosu+N:nos,u KAVA ;
nosunina+N:nos,u#nina%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@notar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@notar REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@notariaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@notari´aat TAUD ;
notaribüroo+N:notari#bür´oo ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@notatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@notatsi´oon TAUD ;
noteerimine+N:not´eerimine OLULINE ;
noteerimiskomisjon+N:not´eerimis#komisjon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@notiits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@not´iits TAUD ;
nototeenia+N:notot´eenia AASTA ;
notsu+N:not,su PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nott+N:@P.Stem.Nom@n´ot,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov´aator REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novaatorlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov´aatorlus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novell+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov´el,l TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novellett+N:@P.Stem.Nom@novell´et,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novellikirjandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov`el,li#kirjandus OLULINE ;
novellikirjanik+N:nov`el,li#k`irjan´ik ELANIK ;
novellikogu+N:nov`el,li#kogu%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
novellikogumik+N:nov`el,li#k`ogum´ik ELANIK ;
novellilooming+N:nov`el,li#looming VIRSIK ;
novellimeister+N:nov`el,li#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
novelliraamat+N:nov`el,li#raamat VIRSIK ;
novellisari+N:nov`el,li#s´arJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novellist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@novell´ist TAUD ;
novellistika+N:novell`is,tika AASTA ;
novellitoodang+N:nov`el,li#toodang VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@november+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov´embE2r REDEL ;
novembrikuu+N:nov´embri#k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@noviits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nov´iits TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@novokaiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@novoka´iin TAUD ;
nublakas+N:nublaka LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nubuk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nubuk REDEL ;
nubul+N:nubul MAGUS ;
nudipea+N:nud,i#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
nudisaba+N:nud,i#saba%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%}%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
nudism+N:nud´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nudistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nudistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nudisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@nudisus OLULINE ;
nuga+N:nuG1a%>%{pl.e%} KAVA ;
nugiline+N:nugiline OLULINE ;
nugiloom+N:nugi#l´oom%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
